California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(f) When a county is informed that an applicant or beneficiary is eligible for benefits under the federal Medicare Program, the county shall determine whether that individual is eligible under the Qualified Medicare Beneficiary program, the Specified Low-Income Medicare Beneficiary program, or the Qualifying Individual program, and shall enroll the applicant or beneficiary in the appropriate program.

(g) (1) The department shall enter into a Medicare Part A buy-in agreement for qualified Medicare beneficiaries with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services by submitting a state plan amendment with a proposed effective date in accordance with paragraph (2).

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), the Medicare Part A buy-in agreement described in this subdivision shall be effective on January 1,
 2025, or the date the department communicates to the Department of Finance in writing that systems have been programmed for implementation of this subdivision, whichever date is later.

(3) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and that federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(4) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, until the time regulations are adopted.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “Medicare Part A
 buy-in agreement” means an agreement authorized by Section 1395v of Title 42 of the United States Code under which the state shall pay Medicare Part A premiums for qualified individuals who are enrolled in both the Medicare Program and the Medi-Cal program.

(h) This section shall become inoperative on
 July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 70) by Stats. 2026, Ch. 252, Sec. 16.   (AB 173)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 71 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.11.

(a) To the extent required by federal law for qualified beneficiaries enrolled in the Medicare Program, the department shall pay the premiums, deductibles, and coinsurance for elderly and disabled persons entitled to benefits under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act, whose income does not exceed the federal poverty level.

(b) The department shall pay, in addition to subdivision (a), applicable additional premiums, deductibles, and coinsurance for drug coverage extended to qualified beneficiaries enrolled in the Medicare Program.

(c) The deductible payments required by subdivision (b) may be covered by providing the same drug coverage as offered to categorically needy recipients, as
 defined in Section 14050.1.

(d) As specified in this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to assist in the payment of Medicare Part B premiums for qualified low-income Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are ineligible for federal sharing or federal contribution for the payment of those premiums.

(e) For a Medi-Cal beneficiary who has a spend down of excess income but who is ineligible for the assistance provided pursuant to subdivision (a), or who is ineligible for any other federally funded assistance for the payment of the beneficiary’s Medicare Part B premium, the department shall pay for the beneficiary’s Medicare Part B premium in the month following each month that the beneficiary’s spend down of excess income has been met.

(f) When a county is informed that an applicant or beneficiary is eligible for benefits
 under the Medicare Program, the county shall determine whether that individual is eligible under the Qualified Medicare Beneficiary program, the Specified Low-Income Medicare Beneficiary program, or the Qualifying Individual program, and shall enroll the applicant or beneficiary in the appropriate program.

(g) (1) The department shall enter into a Medicare Part A buy-in agreement for qualified Medicare beneficiaries with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services by submitting a state plan amendment with a proposed effective date in accordance with paragraph (2).

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), the Medicare Part A buy-in agreement described in this subdivision shall be effective on January 1, 2025, or the date the department communicates to the Department of Finance in writing that systems have been programmed for implementation of this subdivision,
 whichever date is later.

(3) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and that federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(4) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this subdivision by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, until the time regulations are adopted.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “Medicare Part A buy-in agreement” means an agreement authorized by Section 1395v of Title 42 of the United States Code under which the state shall pay Medicare Part A premiums for
 qualified individuals who are enrolled in both the Medicare Program and the Medi-Cal program.

(h) This section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 707, Sec. 2) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 53.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative January 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 52 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.11.

(a) To the extent required by federal law for qualified beneficiaries enrolled in the federal Medicare Program, the department shall pay the premiums, deductibles, and coinsurance for elderly and disabled persons entitled to benefits under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act, whose income does not exceed the federal poverty level and whose resources do not exceed the amount specified in subdivision (a) of Section 14005.62.

(b) For beneficiaries enrolled as of the operative date of this section, subdivision (a) shall apply beginning with the beneficiary’s first annual redetermination conducted on or after the operative date of this section.

(c) The department shall pay,
 in addition to subdivision (a), applicable additional premiums, deductibles, and coinsurance for drug coverage extended to qualified beneficiaries enrolled in the federal Medicare Program.

(d) The deductible payments required by subdivision (c) may be covered by providing the same drug coverage as offered to categorically needy recipients, as defined in Section 14050.1.

(e) As specified in this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to assist in the payment of Medicare Part B premiums for qualified low-income Medi-Cal beneficiaries who are ineligible for federal sharing or federal contribution for the payment of those premiums.

(f) For a Medi-Cal beneficiary who has a spend down of excess income but who is ineligible for the assistance provided pursuant to subdivision (a), or who is ineligible for any other
 federally funded assistance for the payment of the beneficiary’s Medicare Part B premium, the department shall pay for the beneficiary’s Medicare Part B premium in the month following each month that the beneficiary’s spend down of excess income has been met.

(g) When a county is informed that an applicant or beneficiary is eligible for benefits under the federal Medicare Program, the county shall determine whether that individual is eligible under the Qualified Medicare Beneficiary program, the Specified Low-Income Medicare Beneficiary program, or the Qualifying Individual program, and shall enroll the applicant or beneficiary in the appropriate program.

(h) (1) The department shall enter into a Medicare Part A buy-in agreement for qualified Medicare beneficiaries with the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services by submitting a state plan
 amendment with a proposed effective date in accordance with paragraph (2).

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), the Medicare Part A buy-in agreement described in this subdivision shall be effective on January 1, 2025, or the date the department communicates to the Department of Finance in writing that systems have been programmed for implementation of this subdivision, whichever date is later.

(3) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and that federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(4) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this
 subdivision by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, until the time regulations are adopted.

(5) For purposes of this subdivision, “Medicare Part A buy-in agreement” means an agreement authorized by Section 1395v of Title 42 of the United States Code under which the state shall pay Medicare Part A premiums for qualified individuals who are enrolled in both the Medicare Program and the Medi-Cal program.

(i) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 70) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 71.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.12.

(a) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, the department shall establish the income levels for maintenance need at the lowest levels that reasonably permit medically needy persons to meet their basic needs for food, clothing, and shelter, and for which federal financial participation will still be provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. It is the intent of the Legislature that the income levels for maintenance need for medically needy aged, blind, and disabled adults, in particular, shall be based upon amounts that adequately reflect their needs.

(1) Subject to paragraph (2), reductions in the maximum aid payment levels set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 in the 1991–92 fiscal year, and thereafter, shall not result
 in a reduction in the income levels for maintenance under this section.

(2) (A) The department shall seek any necessary federal authorization for maintaining the income levels for maintenance at the levels in effect June 30, 1991.

(B) If federal authorization is not obtained, medically needy persons shall not be required to pay the difference between the spend down of excess income as determined based on the payment levels in effect on June 30, 1991, under Section 11450, and the
 spend down of excess income as determined based on the payment levels in effect on July 1, 1991, and thereafter.

(3) Any medically needy person who was eligible for benefits under this chapter as categorically needy for the calendar month immediately preceding the effective date of the reductions in the minimum basic standards of adequate care for the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program as set forth in Section 11452.018 made in the 1995–96 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not be responsible for paying their spend down of excess income if all of the following apply:

(A) The person had eligibility as categorically
 needy terminated by the reductions in the minimum basic standards of adequate care.

(B) The person, but for the reductions, would be eligible to continue receiving benefits under this chapter as categorically needy.

(C) The person is ineligible to receive benefits without a spend down of excess income as a medically needy person pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2).

(b) In the case of a single individual, the amount of the income level for maintenance per month shall be 80 percent of the highest amount that would ordinarily be paid to a family of two persons, without any income or resources, under subdivision (a) of
 Section 11450, multiplied by the federal financial participation rate.

(c) In the case of a family of two adults, the income level for maintenance per month shall be the highest amount that would ordinarily be paid to a family of three persons without income or resources under subdivision (a) of Section 11450, multiplied by the federal financial participation rate.

(d) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, for a person in a medical institution or nursing facility, or for a person receiving institutional or noninstitutional services from a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly organization pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), the amount considered as required for maintenance per month shall be computed in accordance with, and for those purposes required by, Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, and regulations adopted pursuant
 thereto. Those amounts shall be computed pursuant to regulations that include providing for the following purposes:

(1) Personal and incidental needs in the amount of not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) per month while a patient. The department may, by regulation, increase this amount as necessitated by increasing costs of personal and incidental needs. A long-term health care facility shall not charge an individual for the laundry services or periodic hair care specified in Section 14110.4.

(2) The upkeep and maintenance of the home.

(3) The support and care of their minor children, or any disabled relative for whose support they have contributed regularly, if there is no community spouse.

(4) If the person is an institutionalized spouse, for the
 support and care of their community spouse, minor or dependent children, dependent parents, or dependent siblings of either spouse, provided the individuals are residing with the community spouse.

(5) The community spouse monthly income allowance shall be established at the maximum amount permitted in accordance with Section 1924(d)(1)(B) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-5(d)(1)(B)).

(6) The family allowance for each family member residing with the community spouse shall be computed in accordance with the formula established in Section 1924(d)(1)(C) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-5(d)(1)(C)).

(e) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, with regard to a person in a licensed community care facility, the amount considered as required
 for maintenance per month shall be computed pursuant to regulations adopted by the department that provide for the support and care of their spouse, minor children, or any disabled relative for whose support they have contributed regularly.

(f) The income levels for maintenance per month, except as specified in subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, shall be equal to the highest amounts that would ordinarily be paid to a family of the same size without any income or resources under subdivision (a) of Section 11450, multiplied by the federal financial participation rate.

(g) The “federal financial participation rate,” as used in this section, shall mean 13313 percent, or such other rate set forth in Section 1903 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396(b)), or its
 successor provisions.

(h) The income levels for maintenance per month shall not be decreased to reflect the presence in the household of persons receiving forms of aid other than Medi-Cal.

(i) When family members maintain separate residences, but eligibility is determined as a single unit under Section 14008, the income levels for maintenance per month shall be established for each household in accordance with subdivisions (b) to (h), inclusive. The total of these levels shall be the level for the single eligibility unit.

(j) The income levels for maintenance per month established pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (i), inclusive, shall be calculated on an annual basis, rounded to the next higher multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), and then prorated.

(k) If the conditions described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 14005.12, as added by Section 73 of the act that added this subdivision, have been met, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14005.12, as added by Section 73 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 72) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 71.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative on or after January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.    Repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.    See later operative version amended by Sec. 72 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.12.

(a) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, the department shall establish the income levels for maintenance need at the lowest levels that reasonably permit medically needy persons to meet their basic needs for food, clothing, and shelter, and for which federal financial participation will still be provided under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act. It is the intent of the Legislature that the income levels for maintenance need for medically needy aged, blind, and disabled adults, in particular, shall be based upon amounts that adequately reflect their needs.

(1) Subject to paragraph (2), reductions in the maximum aid payment levels set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 11450 in the 1991–92 fiscal year, and thereafter, shall not result
 in a reduction in the income levels for maintenance under this section.

(2) (A) The department shall seek any necessary federal authorization for maintaining the income levels for maintenance at the levels in effect June 30, 1991, and, commencing no sooner than January 1, 2025, as described in subdivision (b).

(B) If federal authorization is not obtained, medically needy persons shall not be required to pay the difference between the spend down of excess income as determined based on the payment levels in effect on June 30, 1991, under Section 11450, and the
 spend down of excess income as determined based on the payment levels in effect on July 1, 1991, and thereafter.

(3) Any medically needy person who was eligible for benefits under this chapter as categorically needy for the calendar month immediately preceding the effective date of the reductions in the minimum basic standards of adequate care for the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program as set forth in Section 11452.018 made in the 1995–96 Regular Session of the Legislature shall not be responsible for paying their spend down of excess income if all of the following apply:

(A) The person had eligibility as categorically
 needy terminated by the reductions in the minimum basic standards of adequate care.

(B) The person, but for the reductions, would be eligible to continue receiving benefits under this chapter as categorically needy.

(C) The person is ineligible to receive benefits without a spend down of excess income as a medically needy person pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2).

(b) (1) Effective no sooner than January 1, 2025, and to the extent the department determines the conditions described in paragraph (2) have been met, the amount of the income level for maintenance per month shall be equal to the
 income limit for Medi-Cal without a
 spend down of excess income for individuals described in Section 1396a(m)(1)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as that income limit is calculated pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 14005.40.

(2) Implementation of this section is contingent on both of the following conditions:

(A) All necessary federal approvals have been obtained by the department.

(B) The Legislature has appropriated funding to implement this section after a determination that ongoing General Fund resources are available to support the ongoing implementation of this section in the 2024–25 fiscal year and subsequent fiscal years.

(3) The department shall issue a declaration certifying the date that all conditions in
 paragraph (2) have been met. The department shall post the declaration on its internet website and provide a copy of the declaration to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of the Senate, the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, and the Legislative Counsel.

(c) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, for a person in a medical institution or nursing facility, or for a person receiving institutional or noninstitutional services from a Program of All-Inclusive Care for the Elderly organization pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), the amount considered as required for maintenance per month shall be computed in accordance with, and for those purposes required by, Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Those amounts shall be computed pursuant to regulations that include providing for the following purposes:

(1) Personal and incidental needs in the amount of not less than thirty-five dollars ($35) per month while a patient. The department may, by regulation, increase this amount as necessitated by increasing costs of personal and incidental needs. A long-term health care facility shall not charge an individual for the laundry services or periodic hair care specified in Section 14110.4.

(2) The upkeep and maintenance of the home.

(3) The support and care of their minor children, or any disabled relative for whose support they have contributed regularly, if there is no community spouse.

(4) If the person is an institutionalized spouse, for the support and care of their community spouse, minor or dependent children, dependent parents, or dependent siblings of either spouse, provided the individuals are residing
 with the community spouse.

(5) The community spouse monthly income allowance shall be established at the maximum amount permitted in accordance with Section 1924(d)(1)(B) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-5(d)(1)(B)).

(6) The family allowance for each family member residing with the community spouse shall be computed in accordance with the formula established in Section 1924(d)(1)(C) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-5(d)(1)(C)).

(d) For the purposes of Sections 14005.4 and 14005.7, with regard to a person in a licensed community care facility, the amount considered as required for maintenance per month shall be computed pursuant to regulations adopted by the department that provide for the support and care of their spouse, minor children, or any
 disabled relative for whose support they have contributed regularly.

(e) The income levels for maintenance per month shall not be decreased to reflect the presence in the household of persons receiving forms of aid other than Medi-Cal.

(f) When family members maintain separate residences, but eligibility is determined as a single unit under Section 14008, the income levels for maintenance per month shall be established for each household in accordance with subdivisions (b) to (e), inclusive. The total of these levels shall be the level for the single eligibility unit.

(g) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins or
 notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. Within two calendar years of implementing subdivision (d) of Section 14005.12, the department shall adopt, amend, or repeal any necessary regulations.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), whichever is later.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 73) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 72.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative on or after January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.13.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14005.12, when an individual residing in a long-term care facility would incur a long-term care patient liability for services under this chapter due to income that exceeds that allowed for the incidental and personal needs of the individual, a specified portion of the individual’s earned income from therapeutic wages shall be exempt. Therapeutic wages are wages earned by the individual under all of the following conditions:

(1) A physician who does not have a financial interest in the long-term care facility in which the
 individual resides, and who is in charge of the individual’s case, prescribes work as therapy for the individual.

(2) The individual must be employed within the same long-term care facility where they reside.

(3) The individual’s employment does not displace any existing employees.

(4) The individual has resided in a long-term care facility for a continuous period commencing at least five years prior to the date of the addition of this section as originally adopted during the 1983–84 Regular Session.

(b) The amount of earned income from therapeutic wages that shall be exempt shall be the lesser of 70 percent of the gross therapeutic wages or 70 percent of the maintenance level for a noninstitutionalized person or family of corresponding size as
 described in subdivision (b), (c), or (e) of Section 14005.12.

(c) The provisions of this section shall be given retroactive effect for the period commencing June 1, 1983.

(d) This section shall not become operative unless and until the necessary waivers are obtained from the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(e) The director shall adopt regulations implementing this section as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. For the purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act, the adoption of the regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section
 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, emergency regulations adopted by the department in order to implement this section shall not be subject to the review and approval of the Office of Administrative Law. These regulations shall become effective immediately upon filing with the Secretary of State.

(f) If the conditions described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 14005.12, as added by Section 73 of the act that added this subdivision, have been met, this section shall become inoperative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14005.12, as added by Section 73 of the act that added this subdivision, whichever is later, and shall be repealed on January 1 directly following that date.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 74) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 73.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.    Conditionally inoperative on or after January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.    Repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.    See later operative version amended by Sec. 74 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.13.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 14005.12, when an individual residing in a long-term care facility would incur a long-term care patient liability for services under this chapter due to income that exceeds that allowed for the incidental and personal needs of the individual, a specified portion of the individual’s earned income from therapeutic wages shall be exempt. Therapeutic wages are wages earned by the individual under all of the following conditions:

(1) A physician who does not have a financial interest in the long-term care facility in which the
 individual resides, and who is in charge of the individual’s case, prescribes work as therapy for the individual.

(2) The individual must be employed within the same long-term care facility where they reside.

(3) The individual’s employment does not displace any existing employees.

(4) The individual has resided in a long-term care facility for a continuous period commencing at least five years prior to the date of the addition of this section as originally adopted during the 1983–84 Regular Session.

(b) The amount of earned income from therapeutic wages that shall be exempt shall be the lesser of 70 percent of the gross therapeutic wages or 70 percent of the maintenance level as described in subdivision (b) of Section 14005.12.

(c) The provisions of this section shall be given retroactive effect for the period commencing June 1, 1983.

(d) This section shall not become operative unless and until the necessary waivers are obtained from the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. Within two calendar years of implementing subdivision (d) of Section 14005.12, the department shall adopt, amend, or repeal any necessary regulations.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, or the date certified by the department pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 14005.12, as added by Section 73 of Chapter 47 of the Statutes of 2022, whichever is later.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 738, Sec. 15) by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 74.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative on or after January 1, 2025, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.14.

(a) In addition to the income exemptions specified in subdivision (a) of Section 14005.7, an income exemption shall be allowed each month for the amount actually paid toward the cost of in-home supportive services needed as determined under standards and procedures established by the Director of Social Services, by a person who is eligible for Medi-Cal in accordance with Section 14005. 3 or 14005.7. For the purpose of this section, “in-home supportive services” means those services that are available to recipients of the In-Home Supportive Services Program as defined by the Director of Social Services in
 regulations adopted pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 of Division 9.

(b) The income exemption provided by this section for those persons eligible for Medi-Cal in accordance with Section 14005.7 shall be restricted to those persons who, without in-home supportive services, would require 24-hour-a-day care in a health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, or a community care facility, as defined under Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The State Department of Health Services shall seek all federal waivers necessary to allow for federal financial participation. The income exemption authorized by subdivision (b) shall remain in effect during the time period that the federal waivers are pending. If the necessary federal waivers cannot be obtained, the income exemption authorized by subdivision (b)
 shall continue to be implemented by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 364, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.15.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 14005, Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall obtain family planning services through the Medi-Cal program to the extent they are available through such program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1213.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.16.

(a) In determining the eligibility of a married individual pursuant to Section 14005.4 or 14005.7, who resides in a nursing facility, and who is in a Medi-Cal family budget unit separate from that of his or her spouse, the community property interest of the noninstitutionalized spouse in the income of the married individual shall not be considered income available to that individual. 

(b) For purposes of this section, there shall be a presumption, rebuttable by either spouse, that each spouse has a community property interest in one-half of
 the total monthly income of both spouses.

(c) (1) This section shall not become operative unless Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is amended to authorize the consideration of state community property laws in determining eligibility or the federal government authorizes the state to apply community property laws in that determination.

(2) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature upon the occurrence of the amendment of federal law or the receipt of federal approval, as specified in paragraph (1).

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1430) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 7.5.   Effective September 26, 1990.   Section conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.17.

(a) In determining the eligibility of an institutionalized spouse pursuant to Section 14005.4 or 14005.7, who resides in a medical institution or nursing facility, and who is in a Medi-Cal family budget unit separate from that of his or her spouse, the community property interest of either spouse in the income of the other spouse shall not be considered when determining eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits.

(b) In the case of an institutionalized spouse, income shall be
 determined in accordance with subsections (b) and (d) of Section 1924 of the federal Social Security Act and regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

(c) (1) This section shall remain operative only until Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is amended to authorize the consideration of state community property law in determining eligibility under this chapter, or the federal government authorizes the consideration of state community property in that determination.

(2) The department shall report to the appropriate committees of the Legislature upon the occurrence of the amendment of federal law or receipt of federal authorization as specified in paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1430, Sec. 5.5.   Effective October 2, 1989.   Conditionally inoperative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.18.

(a) (1) An individual is eligible, to the extent required by federal law, as though the individual was pregnant, for all pregnancy-related and postpartum services for a 60-day period beginning on the last day of pregnancy.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “postpartum services” means those services provided after childbirth, child delivery, or miscarriage.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), Section 15840, the income eligibility requirements specified in Section 15832, and the annual redetermination requirements described in Section 14005.37, a pregnant individual who is
 receiving health care coverage under a program identified in subdivision (d) and who is diagnosed with a maternal mental health condition shall remain eligible for the Medi-Cal program under their current eligibility category for a period of one year following the last day of the individual’s pregnancy if the individual complies with the requirements specified in subdivision (c) and is otherwise eligible for the Medi-Cal program.

(2) For purposes of this section, “maternal mental health condition” means a mental health condition that occurs during pregnancy or during the postpartum period and, includes, but is not limited to, postpartum depression.

(c) (1) An individual, or a designee of the individual, who seeks to extend Medi-Cal program coverage pursuant
 to this section shall submit to a county eligibility worker a note from that individual’s treating health care provider stating that the health care provider has diagnosed the individual with a maternal mental health condition within 60 days following the last day of the individual’s pregnancy.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an individual who has had Medi-Cal coverage discontinued within the 60-day period beginning on the last day of pregnancy, but who is diagnosed with a maternal mental health condition more than 60 days following the last day of pregnancy and within the time limit described in subdivision (i) of Section 14005.37, may be reinstated to their previous Medi-Cal eligibility pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 14005.37 by submitting a note, as described in paragraph (1), from the individual’s treating health
 care provider within the timeframe described in that subdivision.

(d) For purposes of this section, “Medi-Cal program” refers to any of the following programs:

(1) The Medi-Cal Access Program, as described in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 15810) of Part 3.3.

(2) The Medi-Cal program, as described in this article.

(3) The Perinatal Services Program, as described in Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 14148).

(e) This section does not limit the ability of a qualified individual to apply for and purchase a qualified health plan in Covered California pursuant to Title 22 (commencing with Section 100500) of
 the Government Code if the qualified individual is otherwise eligible for coverage pursuant to that title.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this
 section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(g) Implementation of this section is subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for these purposes.

(h) This section shall become inoperative commencing on the date that Section 14005.185 is implemented. If made inoperative, this section shall become operative again if, and upon the date that, Section 14005.185 is no longer implemented. The department shall determine the implementation status of Section 14005.185 and shall post, on the department’s internet website, notice of its determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 362.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Conditionally inoperative or operative as prescribed in subdivision (h).)
-------------------------------------------

14005.185.
